Dictionaries/dictionaries-master/sr/sr-Latn.dic
alifatski/745
antivegetativni/746
antikorupcionaški/745
artiljerijski/745
autistični/746,19
bakarnosmeđ/752
baritonski/745
bež/753
bezvrijednostan/754
belobrk/751
belokos/757
belonog/756
besavestan/754
besklasni/746
beskoristan/754
bjelobrad/755
bjelokos/757
blag/756
blagorek/751
blaženopočivši/750
bled/755
bledožut/748
bledosmeđ/752
bojev/749,19
bojkotni/746
bos/757
brzonog/756
brujeći/750
busovit/748
vanfakultetski/745
variran/747
velečastan/754
velik/751,19
vehementni/746
vijorog/756
vitkonog/756
vjerujući/750
vlasast/748
vodonepropustan/754
vodorastvoriv/749
vojnoobaveštajni/746
vranokos/757
geomehanički/745
glistolik/751
godišnji/750
golobrad/755
golonog/756
gord/755
gorezapočet/748
grabežljiv/749
gustiozni/746
gustokos/757
gustolistan/754
gušterolik/751
darnut/748,19
dvadesettrogodišnji/750
dvogod/755
dvook/751
dvored/755
dvorog/756
debelolistan/754
devetnaestočasovni/746
devetostruk/751
dekoltovan/747
demagnetizujući/750
desetonog/756
deskriptorski/745
dobromisleći/750
dokupljiv/749
dorečen/747,19
dronjast/748
društvenokoristan/754
dubok/751,19
dug/756,19
dugobrad/755
dugovlas/757
dugodelujući/750
dugokos/757
dugonos/757
dugorog/756
đavolik/751
evaluativni/746
egzacerbacioni/745
žurajiv/749
žutokos/757
žutosmeđ/752
zabreknut/748
zagaravljen/747
zagasitosmeđ/752
zalogoprimački/745
zapanjen/747
zasjenut/748
zatajiv/749
začudni/746
zvezdolik/751
zgađan/747
zlatokos/757
zlatorog/756
zlehud/755
zlorek/751
zlohud/755
zmajevit/748
izvinjavajući/750
izvjestan/754,19
izgnječiv/749
izmamljivan/747
irigacioni/745
isključivan/747
ispomognut/748
isporediv/749,19
ispotajni/746
iscepljen/747
jakostan/754
jasnovid/755
jedanaestostruk/751
jednogod/755
jednored/755
jednorog/756
kenjkav/749
kesast/748
kinematički/745
klečeći/750
kolaborativni/746,19
korepetiran/747
koristan/754,19
kos/757
koštunjast/748
krajputaški/745
kratkovek/751
kratkokos/757
kratkonog/756
kržljav/749
krivorog/756
krnjorog/756
kukonos/757
kupast/748
leporek/751
likovni/746,19
limitirajući/750,19
lišajiv/749
lopatičast/748
lud/755
makrometarski/745
mekinjast/748
mekokos/757
mekoustan/754
minimalistični/746
miocenski/745
mlak/751
mlitav/749
monetizovan/747
nag/756
nadahnut/748,19
nalomljen/747
nasamariv/749
natvrd/755
negdanji/750
nepotistički/745
nesprečiv/749
neurokognitivni/746
nefrogen/747
obestan/754
ovoletnji/750
ovostran/747
odnarodiv/749
okruglast/748
okupljen/747
opak/751
oraći/750
osmosobni/746
osušiv/749,19
otelovljivan/747
otputovali/745
oštrovid/755
petnaestostruk/751
petogodišnji/750
plavokos/757
pluriformni/746
pobrojan/747,19
pobrojiv/749
povijestan/754
pogurnut/748
podsmjevački/745
podug/756
polivan/747,19
polunag/756
polusvestan/754
polutvrd/755
ponajbrži/750
poprek/751
porječiv/749,19
potpisni/746
počastan/754
preblijed/755
predrag/756
predsedavajući/750
preživarski/745,19
prekuđen/747
premilostan/754
premlad/755
preobazriv/749
preokrenut/748,19
prestrog/756
probirljiv/749,19
provožen/747
prozirni/746,19
prosed/755
prošlojesenji/750
prćonos/757
psetolik/751
psihoorganski/745
punomastan/754
rad/755,19
razaslat/748
raznovrstan/754,19
razrođen/747
restitucionalni/746
riđ/752
ritav/749
ropski/745,19
rus/757
sablastan/754
sadašnji/750
samovlastan/754
samouništavajući/750
svakolik/751
sveblag/756
svevlastan/754
svež/753
svetložut/748
svetlosmeđ/752
svijetlosmeđ/752
svilokos/757
svjež/753
svođen/747
sedokos/757
sijed/755
sitni/746
sjedokos/757
skrbnički/745
slobodnomisleći/750
smeđ/752
smeđokos/757
snalažljiv/749,19
stablolik/751
starostan/754
stisnut/748
strog/756
sukuletni/746
supski/745
tamnosmeđ/752
tamošnji/750
tankozid/755
traverziran/747
trinaestospratni/746
trnolik/751
trogod/755
troetnički/745
tuđ/752
Tuzla/727
turnut/748,19
Turska/728
ćutljiv/749,19
Uagadugu/729
ubog/756
uzbunjujući/750
unakrstan/754
uozbiljen/747,19
fibrocistični/746
Fidži/730
forenzički/745,19
Francuska/731
frljnut/748
Havaji/732
Hale/733
Hercegnov/734
Hercegovina/735
Holandija/736
Hrvatska/737
hroptav/749
hud/755
cakleći/750
celishodni/746,19
celomudren/747
cestarski/745
crvenokos/757
crvenolik/751
crvenoprs/757
crnonog/756
Crnotrav/738
četvorored/755
Češka/739
Čibu/740
Čile/733
čovjekolik/751
čupast/748
Švedska/741
širokonos/757
Škotska/742
Šolaji/732
Španija/743
Šumadija/744
